Maryland, session 2026, SB0927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Board” means the Board of License Commissioners for Baltimore City.
(3) “Kappa Alpha Psi Conclave” means the Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity,
Inc. 2027 Conclave and 88th grand chapter meeting for Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity, Inc.
(4) “License holder” means the holder of an alcoholic beverages license
issued by the Board of License Commissioners for Baltimore City.
(5) (i) “Related event” means an event related to the Kappa Alpha Psi
Conclave in which:
1. a license holder participates in a coordinated promotion
with a third–party promoter to sell or provide alcoholic beverages during a specified time;
and
2. at least 75 individuals are reasonably anticipated to
participate.
(ii) “Related event” includes an event for which tickets are sold to
the public, either in advance or at the door, or a cover charge is imposed, including a concert,
an entertainment event, a happy hour, or a party.
(6) “Related event promoter” means an individual, a for–profit
organization, or a nonprofit organization that promotes a related event.
– 1 –

Ch. 843 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) A related event promoter or participating license holder on behalf of a
related event promoter shall apply for a permit from the Board before the related event
promoter may publicize, sell tickets for, organize, operate, produce, or stage a related event.
(2) A holder of a State caterer’s license shall obtain a Class C per diem beer,
beer and wine, or beer, wine, and liquor license from the Board before the holder may act
as a participating license holder at a related event.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Board may
grant the permit to an applicant who submits an application to the Board as provided under
Title 4 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article at least 30 days before the date of
the related event.
(2) Before being granted the permit, an applicant shall:
(i) obtain written consent from a designee of Visit Baltimore;
(ii) if required based on the type of premises to be used:
1. obtain a special event permit from the Baltimore City
Department of Transportation; and
2. provide a copy of the special event permit to the Board;
and
(iii) provide a completed application that:
1. is dated and notarized, and signed by each license holder
that will participate in the related event;
2. lists each premises for which the related event will be held;
and
3. is accompanied by any other document that the Board
requires.
(3) An individual who applies for and is issued the permit is not required
to be a resident of or registered to vote in Baltimore City.
(4) Within 7 days after receiving an application, the Board shall grant or
deny the permit or request more information from the applicant.
(5) A permit may not be altered within 14 days before the
related event is scheduled to take place.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 843
(d) The permit authorizes the related event promoter and participating license
holder to conduct a related event.
(e) The permit for the related event may be in effect for the time stated on the
special event permit required under subsection (c)(2) of this section.
(f) The Board may adopt regulations establishing requirements for:
(1) conducting a related event, including health and safety standards to be
met by the related event promoter and participating license holder; and
(2) providing public notice of a related event at the premises of
participating license holders by the related event promoter or participating license holders.
(g) (1) The application fee is $50, payable on the submission of the application.
(2) The permit fee, payable when the permit is granted, is:
(i) $500, if the Baltimore City Fire Marshal has determined that the
maximum capacity for the proposed location is less than 300 persons; or
(ii) $1,500, if the Baltimore City Fire Marshal has determined that
the maximum capacity for the proposed location is 300 or more persons.
(h) For the offense of publicizing, selling tickets or imposing a cover charge for,
organizing, operating, producing, facilitating, or staging a related event with the knowledge
or a reason to know that a related event promoter’s permit required under this section has
not been obtained, the Board shall impose a fine of not less than $1,000 and not more than
$3,000 or suspend the license or both.
(i) For the offense by a holder of a State caterer’s license of participating in a
related event without first obtaining a Class C per diem beer, beer and wine, or beer, wine,
and liquor license as required under this section, the Executive Director of the Alcohol,
Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission shall impose a fine of not less than $1,000 and not more
than $3,000 or suspend the State caterer’s license or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 6 months and, at the end of
December 31, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –